Utah statutes.
77-38-6.   Victim's right to privacy.

(1)  The victim of a crime has the right, at any court proceeding, including any juvenile court proceeding, not to testify regarding the victim's address, telephone number, place of employment, or other locating information unless the victim specifically consents or the court orders disclosure on finding that a compelling need exists to disclose the information.  A court proceeding on whether to order disclosure shall be in camera.

(2)  A defendant may not compel any witness to a crime, at any court proceeding, including any juvenile court proceeding, to testify regarding the witness's address, telephone number, place of employment, or other locating information unless the witness specifically consents or the court orders disclosure on finding that a compelling need for the information exists.  A court proceeding on whether to order disclosure shall be in camera.

